Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 127 of Title 85A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ACUTE MYOCARDIAL INFARCTION OR STROKE.
A. A firefighter, peace officer, or emergency medical
technician who suffers an acute myocardial infarction or stroke
resulting in disability or death is presumed to have suffered the

HB4260 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

disa bility or death during the course and scope of employment as a
firefighter, peace officer, or emergency medical technician if:
1. While on duty, the firefighter, peace officer, or emergency
medical technician:
a. was engaged in a situation that involved stressful or
strenuous physical activity involving fire
suppression, rescue, hazardous material response,
emergency medical services, law enforcement, or other
emergency response activity, or
b. participated in a training exercise that involved
stressful or strenuous physical activity, and
2. The acute myocardial infarction or stroke occurred not later
than eight (8) hours after the end of a shift in which the
firefighter, peace officer, or emergency medical technician was
engaged in the activity described in paragraph 1 of this subsection.
B. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the medical
events described in subsection A of this section arose out of the
employment performed by the person and occurred while the employee
was acting within the scope of employment. This presumption may be
overcome by clear and convincing evidence.
C. For purposes of this section, "stressful or strenuous
physical activity" does not include clerical, administrative, or
nonmanual activities.

HB4260 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. For purposes of this section, "firefighter", "peace
officer", and "emergency medical technician" mean only those
individuals employed by the state, a county, a municipality, or any
other political subdivision of this state.
E. This section shall cease to have full force and effect in
law on November 1, 2031, to allow for a full legislative review of
the fiscal impact.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.














HB4260 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.